Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.150

Normal school grant to former state colleges of education and The Evergreen State College.

The one hundred thousand acres of land granted by the United States government to the state for state normal schools in section 17 of the enabling act are assigned to the support of the regional universities, which were formerly the state colleges of education and to The Evergreen State College.

[ 1993 c 411 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 104; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.150.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 411: See note following RCW 28B.35.751.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.